Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 1 General Provisions

Applied

in

Dewey v. Wentland, 2002 WY 2, 38 P.3d 402,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7 Am. Jur. 2d Attorneys at Law §§ 333 to 369; 51 Am. Jur. 2d Liens § 1 et seq.; 53 Am. Jur. 2d Marshaling Assets §§ 1 to 19, 24 to 28, 43 to 54.

Right to require security as condition of cancelling lien of record or recording payment, 2 ALR2d 1064.

Bank's lien upon commercial paper delivered to it by debtor for collection, 22 ALR2d 478.

Priority as between lien for repairs and the like, and right of seller under conditional sales contract, 36 ALR2d 198.

Liens for severance or dismissal pay provided for by employment contract or collective labor agreement, 40 ALR2d 1044.

Lien for storage of motor vehicle, 48 ALR2d 894.

Lien for improvements made or placed on premises of another by mistake, 57 ALR2d 263.

Decree for periodical payments for alimony or support as a lien or the subject of a declaration of lien, 59 ALR2d 656.

Accountant's right to lien upon client's books and records in former's possession, 76 ALR2d 1322.

Construction, operation and effect of statute giving hospital lien against recovery from tort feasor causing patient's injuries, 25 ALR3d 858.

Surveyor's work as giving rise to right to mechanic's lien, 35 ALR3d 1391.

Doctrine of marshaling assets where the two funds covered by the paramount lien are subject respectively to subordinate liens in favor of different creditors, 76 ALR3d 326.

Lien for towing or storage, ordered by public officer, of motor vehicle, 85 ALR3d 199.

Liability to pay for allegedly unauthorized repairs to motor vehicle, 5 ALR4th 311.

Construction, operation and effect of statute giving hospital lien against recovery from tortfeasor causing patient's injuries, 16 ALR5th 262.

Physicians' and surgeons' liens, 39 ALR5th 787.

Modern views as to validity, under federal constitution, of state prejudgment attachment, garnishment and replevin procedures, distraint procedures under landlord's or innkeeper's lien statutes and like procedures authorizing summary seizure of property, 18 ALR Fed 223.

Right of mortgagee and/or lienor to compensation when property subject to mortgage and/or lien is taken by federal governmental forfeiture based on criminal acts of owner, 136 ALR Fed 593.